Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.209

Insurance and workers' compensation for offenders performing community restitution.

The legislative authority of a city or town may purchase liability insurance in an amount it deems reasonable to protect the city or town, its officers, and employees against liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage incurred by offenders in the course of court-ordered community restitution, and may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or workers under Title 51 RCW.

[ 2002 c 175 s 30; 1984 c 24 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 175: See note following RCW 7.80.130.

Workers' compensation coverage of offenders performing community restitution: RCW 51.12.045.